Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Kentucky Transportation Center

177.375.
Kentucky Transportation Center Advisory Board.

There is created a Kentucky Transportation Center Advisory Board, hereinafter in KRS

177.375

to

177.380

called the transportation center board or the board, to assist in policy formulation for and to provide direction to the Kentucky Transportation Center which is located at the University of Kentucky. The board shall consist of nine (9) members appointed by the Governor.

Of the nine (9) members, three (3) members shall be ex officio and include the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, the state highway engineer and the dean of the College of Engineering at the University of Kentucky. In addition, it is recommended that three (3) of the nine (9) appointments be made in the following manner:

One (1) member appointed from a list of three (3) names submitted by the executive board of the Kentucky Association of Counties;

One (1) member appointed from a list of three (3) names submitted by the executive board of the Kentucky County Judges’ Association; and

One (1) member appointed from a list of three (3) names submitted by the executive board of the Kentucky Municipal League.

Initial appointments made pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection shall be for a period of one (1) year. The remaining appointments shall be for two (2) years except that ex officio members shall serve the same terms as that of their respective offices. Ex officio members and regular members shall have the same powers and voting privileges. Each appointment thereafter shall be for a period of two (2) years.

The Governor shall designate one (1) member of the board as chairman, whose term shall be for two (2) years with said two (2) years being consistent with the biennium budget period. The members shall serve without pay, but shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses from the center’s budget.

Meetings of the board shall be held at least semiannually but may be held more frequently as deemed necessary subject to call by the chairman or by request of a majority of the board members. Board meetings shall concern, among other things, policy matters relating to the transportation center’s technical assistance and research programs, financial plans, and such other matters as necessary to carry out the intent of KRS

177.375

to

177.380

.

Five (5) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for doing business. Each member shall have one (1) vote and a majority vote of the members present shall control on all questions. Each regular and ex officio member may designate a proxy by written notice to the chairman prior to call to order of each meeting and such proxy shall be entitled to cast the member’s vote.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 394, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

177.376.
Duties of board.

The Kentucky Transportation Center Board shall:

Recommend policies and procedures as necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

177.375

to

177.380

;

Review and recommend research, and technical assistance programs undertaken and financed under the provisions of KRS

177.375

to

177.380

;

Review all progress on projects authorized under the provisions of KRS

177.375

to

177.380

;

Provide the Governor, the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission with an annual report by January 15 of each year showing the status of funds appropriated under the provisions of KRS

177.375

to

177.380

for the operation and management of the Kentucky Transportation Center and the progress of the Kentucky Transportation Center’s technical assistance and research programs;

Advise the General Assembly by January 30 during each even-numbered-year regular session of the need for continuation of the Kentucky Transportation Center;

Ensure that personnel and facilities of the regional universities and community colleges are utilized when appropriate for completion of work or service functions performed by the center; and

Ensure that all authorized projects are directed toward transportation improvement and more specifically toward strengthening the transportation system of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 394, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2001, ch. 58, § 9, effective June 21, 2001.

177.377.
Appointment of director.

The president of the University of Kentucky shall appoint a director from a list of three (3) names submitted by the transportation center board. Other employees of the center shall be appointed in the same manner as other staff members of the university. All employees of the Kentucky Transportation Center shall be employees of the University of Kentucky within the provisions of KRS

164.220

to

164.230

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 394, § 3, effective July 13, 1984.

177.378.
Use of funds.

Any state moneys appropriated to the University of Kentucky under KRS

177.375

to

177.380

shall be used for the operation and management of the transportation center’s technical assistance and research programs and for no other purpose.

Funds unexpended at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year or biennium, provided, however, that such surplus shall be included in the budget for the center considered and approved for the ensuing period.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 394, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.

177.379.
Budget.

The director shall submit the transportation center budget in the manner and form set forth for other units of the university, after approval by the transportation center board.

Copies of the approved budget shall be filed with the transportation center board and the Legislative Research Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 394, § 5, effective July 13, 1984.

177.380.
Funds not to be diverted to other use — Records — Annual financial report.

Funds appropriated by KRS

177.375

to

177.380

and any other act for transportation center programs shall not be diverted for any other use.

The University of Kentucky and the transportation center shall maintain such records as necessary to account for all receipts and expenditures credited or charged against the transportation center.

An annual financial report shall be submitted to the executive director of the Legislative Research Commission and to the Governor by the university on behalf of the transportation center.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 394, § 6, effective July 13, 1984.